Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 14 Quo Warranto

10-14-1.
Equity petition in supreme court.

The title to any office, to determine which the writ of quo warranto lies at the common law, may be brought in question by petition to the supreme court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 263, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1160; G.L. 1909, ch. 328, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 379, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 585, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-14-1

.

10-14-2.
Issues determinable in proceedings in nature of quo warranto — Parties.

In any proceeding upon writ of quo warranto, or by information or by petition in the nature of quo warranto, the court may determine the title of the relator or petitioner as well as that of the respondent; and in any such proceeding, all or any persons claiming the same office by whatever title, or claiming different offices depending upon the same election or appointment, may be made parties, and their respective rights may be ascertained and determined; and the court may consolidate for the purposes of healing and adjudication all such proceedings if brought separately.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 263, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 328, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 379, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 585, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-14-2

.

Parties.

A person holding over until his successor was appointed had a sufficient interest to allow him to bring proceedings in his own name to determine right and title to the office. McGroarty v. Ferretti,

56 R.I. 152

, 184 A. 508,

1936 R.I. LEXIS 92

(1936).

In proceeding under this chapter where only the public interest is involved the intervention of the attorney-general is necessary. Black v. Cummings,

62 R.I. 361

, 5 A.2d 858,

1939 R.I. LEXIS 34

(1939).

A petition in equity in the nature of quo warranto can be filed without the intervention of the attorney-general only if the petitioner alleges that he is entitled to the office and that the respondent is not entitled to it. Black v. Cummings,

62 R.I. 361

, 5 A.2d 858,

1939 R.I. LEXIS 34

(1939).

Any proceeding upon a writ of quo warranto or by way of information in the nature of quo warranto which seeks to enforce a public right cannot be brought unless it is instituted by the attorney general or the attorney general intervenes in the proceeding and the relief it affords is limited to the ouster of the incumbent from office while for a petition in equity in the nature of quo warranto there is no necessity for intervention by the attorney general since the proceeding may be instituted by one who claims title to an office and the successful petitioner may obtain a decree which not only ousts the respondent from office but also declares that petitioner is the rightful holder of the office in dispute. Fargnoli v. Cianci,

121 R.I. 153

, 397 A.2d 68,

1979 R.I. LEXIS 1758

(1979).

10-14-3.
Enforcement of judgments — Order of new elections.

In all proceedings under this chapter, the court shall enforce its judgment by appropriate process; and whenever it shall find that no election was made, it may order a new election in all cases where new elections are required by law to be held upon failure to elect in the first instance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 263, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 328, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 379, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 585, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-14-3

.